Tennessee, session 114, SB0586.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-318(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(1) The image was photographed or recorded under circumstances where the
parties agreed or understood that the image would remain private, regardless of whether
the person who distributes the image was a party to the agreement or understanding;
and
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0586
000420
- 1 -